Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0533.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 931c. (1) An individual who intentionally and knowingly makes a false statement or misrepresentation to another individual concerning any of the following is subject to a civil fine of not more than $1,000.00 for each violation: (a) The time, place, or manner of an election. (b) The qualifications for or restrictions on voter eligibility. (c) Criminal penalties associated with voting in an election. (d) An individual's voter registration status or eligibility. (2) An individual intentionally and knowingly makes a false statement or misrepresentation under subsection (1) if the individual knows the statement or misrepresentation is false and makes the false statement or misrepresentation with the intent to impede or prevent another individual from exercising the individual's right to vote in an election. (3) Subject to subsection (4), an entity that employs, for an election-related purpose, an individual who violates this section is subject to a civil fine of not more than $10,000.00, unless that entity demonstrates that the entity did not have any prior knowledge that the individual planned to make a false statement or misrepresentation that violates this section. (4) If an entity described in subsection (3) is a local government, there is a rebuttable presumption that the local government did not have any prior knowledge that an individual planned to make a false statement or misrepresentation that violates this section.